District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-918

Directors.

Repealed.

June 19, 1940, 54 Stat. 484, ch. 397, § 18
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-156, § 2(a), 27 DCR 5113
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(q), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-918.
1981 Ed., § 29-1118.
1973 Ed., § 29-818.